District of Columbia statutes.
1-108

Name of Uniontown changed to Anacostia.

That portion of the District of Columbia prior to April 22, 1886, known and designated as Uniontown, shall be known and designated as Anacostia.

Apr. 22, 1886, 24 Stat. 14, ch. 58
1981 Ed., § 1-108.
1973 Ed., § 1-108.